Massachusetts, session 194th, S184.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 48(c) of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “women-owned businesses” the following:-
The agency shall collect and report aggregate and anonymized data regarding the
programs delivered by its growth capital division at each meeting of its board of directors, on its
website, and in an annual report to be submitted by the agency to the chairs of the joint
committee on ways and means and the joint committee on economic development and emerging
technologies no later than 90 days after the close of each fiscal year. The report shall include, but
not be limited to, jobs created or saved, the amounts and percent of capital distributed to
businesses by the revenue, profits, number of employees, geographic location, industry,
ownership demographics, and other relevant data requested by legislators or stakeholders or
otherwise tracked by the agency.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 48 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “women-owned businesses” the following subsection:-
(i) The agency shall design and implement equity goals across all divisions and
departments, including prioritizing socially or economically disadvantaged businesses, which
may include, but shall not be limited to, minority-owned, women-owned, veteran-owned or
immigrant-owned microbusinesses and small businesses, that have historically faced obstacles to
accessing capital by mandating that any new or changed agency serving microbusinesses or
small businesses prioritize such businesses in their programs whenever feasible, among other
goals designed through stakeholder engagement. The agency shall publish its goals and all
relevant, anonymous data related to those goals on its website and in its annual report to the
chairs of the joint committee on ways and means and the joint committee on economic
development and emerging technologies.
SECTION 3. Chapter 23A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 70. Data transparency and accessibility
(a) The executive office of economic development shall design and implement equity
goals across all divisions and departments, including prioritizing socially or economically
disadvantaged businesses, which may include, but shall not be limited to, minority-owned,
women-owned, veteran-owned or immigrant-owned microbusinesses and small businesses, that
have historically faced obstacles to accessing capital by mandating that any new or changed
agency serving microbusinesses or small businesses prioritize such businesses in their programs
whenever feasible, among other goals designed through stakeholder engagement. The agency
of 3

shall publish its goals and all relevant, anonymous data related to those goals on its website and
in an annual report to the chairs of the joint committee on ways and means and the joint
committee on economic development and emerging technologies.
(b) The executive office of economic development shall regularly collect and report
aggregate and anonymized data and information related to all grant, loan, and other financial and
technical assistance programs provided across all divisions on its website, including but not
limited to geographic distribution, jobs created or saved, demographics of business owners
served, number of employees, annual revenue ranges, business types, and distribution amounts,
and percentages, provided further that the secretary of economic development shall submit an
annual report to the joint committee on economic development and small business with this data
within 90 days of the end of the fiscal year.
of 3